District of Columbia statutes.
31-2502.33

Repealed

Effective dates

Repealed.

April 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-227, § 16(c), 44 DCR 140
1981 Ed., §§ 35-1536 to 35-1541.
D.C. Law 11-268, § 10(r)(2) ( 44 DCR 1730), eff. May 21, 1997, amends former §§ 35-1536, 35-1538, 35-1539, and 35-1540 1981 Ed. subsequent to repeal.